Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6002YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2453 Section 1. Section 298A.2, subsection 2, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) Start-up costs and costs to expand for an approved local 3 program under the statewide preschool program for four-year-old 4 children under chapter 256C . 5